src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/et/hyphenation/hyph_et.dic
4ri2so2l
ri2so
ri4tol
r2it
ri3t2o
ri3t2r
5riu
5ri1v
4riö
2r1j
2r1k
r4ka1d
r1ka
r2k5ai1n
rka4se
r4kek
r1k2e
r2kt4
2r1l
2r1m
r4ma4l1d
r1ma
r3mal
r4me4le
r1me
r4mi1g
r1mi
rmo4ra
r1mo
rmo4s
r2mp4
r2m1s4
2r1n
r4na1d4
r1na
r4neh
r1ne
r2nk4
1ro
roa4
ro3e2
ro4k4k
rol4la
ro2l1l
rol4le
4ro2m1b
2ro1mi
ro4nop
ro1no
roo4ga
r2o2o
roo1g
4ro2sa
ros4p4o
ro2s1p
ro5staa3ti
ro2s1t
ros2taa
ros1ta
rost4aa1t
ros2t4r
4rož
2r1p
rp5re1t
rp2r4
rp1re
2r1r
r3ri
2rs
rsaa4l
r1sa
r3s2aa
r2s4l
r1s4o
r5s2p4o
r2s1p
rs4ta1k
r2s1t
rs1ta
2rt
r4tah
r1ta
r4tos
r3t2o
r2t2r
rt4ra
r4t1ri
rt5r2o2o
rt1ro
rt4sai
r2t1s
rt3s2a
1ru
2rua4
rud4
r4u1j
ru3k2r
ru1k
3ru1ma
r4u1m
4ru2m1b
2ru2m1m
4ru2mp
5rus.
ru4se1t
ru1se
ru4si1n
ru1si
ru4sul
ru1su
ru2t4r
ru1t
ruu1m5a
ru4u1m
4ruur
2r1v
rva4la
rva4lu
r4va2n1n
rva2s5k
rvi2s4k
r3vi
r4voh
r4vok
1rõ
2rõ2l
r5õ1li
rõn4gu
rõ2n1g
4rõr
3rö
4rö1k
röö4pe
röö2p5l4
1rä
4rä4r
1rü
4rük
4rüm
4rü4r
4rž
4rš
1sa
3s2aa
saa5j
saa4lu
s4a4an
4s3aas
3s4a3ba
sa1b
sa4bi.
4sabo
s4a1d
5sa1da
4sa1de
s5a2de1r
2s1ae
s2ae4l
5sa5ga
sa1g
s4age
sa4gu
4sa2h1v
3s4ai.
4sa4i2a
s1ai1n
s4ajan
sa1j
saj4a
sa4ju.
sak4ro
sa1k
sa2k2r
5s4a4k1s
4sa2ku.
sa1ku
sa4kää
sa1kä
4s3a4la.
sa1la
4salas
s4ala1t
5salat.
sa4le1v
sa1le
4sal1la
sa2l1l
4sal3lu
3s4a2lt
sa4l4u1m
sa1lu
5sa2l1v
3s4a1m
4sa2mp
4sa2nk
4s5a2n1n
s4a2nt
4san3ti
s4a1nu
sa4n4u1m
sa2p2r4
sa1p
sa4ris
s2a1ri
s4arv.
sa2r1v
sar4va
sa1se4
3s4as3ti
sa2s1t
sas4tii
sa4su1k
sa1su
sa4s4u1m
3sa1t
4sa2t1l4
s5ava4l1d
sa1v
sav4a
2s3b2
2s3d2
1se
3sea1d
se3a2la
s5ea3li
se5aval
sea2v
seav4a
se4du.
se1d
se1du
4see2la
see4le
s5ee2l1n
see4ma
see1m
4see1pi
see1p
3see1r
see4si
see4t4a4
see1t
4se4fe
se1f
5se1g
se3ga5a4
2seh
3s4e3ha
3se1ho
5se1hu
5s4e1hä
3sei
sei4d
sei4si
3se3ka
se3k2l4
4s5ek2s1p
se4k1s
se4la1j
se1la
4selek
se1le
5se3li
4sel3lu
se2l1l
3se2lt
2se2lu
4se2ns
se5oh
seo4k
se5om
seo4p
seo4r
3se1p
sepa1t4
se1pa
4sere1m
se1r
se1re
4s1e2se.
se1se
se4si.
se1si
4se4si1n
s5es2it
se2s4k
3s4e2s1t
4s5e2ten
se1t
se1t2e
se3t2r
4s1et1t2e
se2t1t
2s1f2
2s1g2
2s1h
1si
3s4ia
sia4h
sie4
5si2g1n
si1g
sig4ra
si2g1r
s5i4ha.
si3ha
sii4g
sii4sa
sii4se
4sii2t1s
si2it
sii4tu
si4ke1t
si1k
si1k2e
sik4o4d
si1ko
sik2s4p
si4k1s
si2kt4
sik4vi
si2k1v
4si2ni1m
si1n
si1ni
s5i4ni1me
4si2ns
sio4le
si4p4ro
si1p
sip2r4
4si2r1r
5si1ru
4si4sa.
si1sa
si3se
s5i4si1k
si1si
si2s2p
sis1se3
si2s1s
s5istu1j
si2s1t
sis3tu
5si3su
2s1j
sja5a4r
sj4a
s3jaa
2s1k
4s1ka
5skaa5la
ska4al
sk4a4no
5skeem.
s1k2e
skee1m
s4ke1la
5ske3le1t
ske1le
s5ken
ski4g
s1ki
s2k2l4
s5klas
sk2la
5skle1r
sk1le
sku1k4
s1ku
3s2ku2l1p
sku4si
s3kus
2s1l
4s1m
sma4sa
s1ma
2s1n
sne4p
s1ne
1so
3sobi
so1b
3soe
s1o4ht
3soi
s5oks.
so4k1s
2so2l
s3olek
so1le
s3oli1j
so1li
5s4o3lo
so3lu1t
so1lu
so2ma
3son
3s2o2o
s2o2o5o
4so4pe
so4p2r4
5sor.
s3o2r1j
3so2rt
2s1os
4sot1su
so2t1s
2s1p
s5pe1r
s1pe
2s1r
2s1s
sse2l4l
s1se
ss2fä
s2s1f2
ssi1n4
s1si
s4si2n1f
s2s1k4
ss4k2e
s2s2p
s5spor
ss1p4o
s2s2t
s5sta1t
ss1ta
ss4ti
ss2t5r
2s4su2s1s
s1su
2s1t
s2taa
s1ta
3staa1d
5sta4a1š
s4tai1n
4s3ta1m
5standa4r1d
s4tan1da
sta4n1d
3s2ta2rt
s4ta3ti
sta1t
5statis
s4te1no
s1t2e
5s2te4p1p
ste1p
ste1t4
s4toh
s3t2o
s4top
s4tot
5strei1k
s2t1r
st2re
st4rei
5strek
5struk3tu
st1ru
stru1k
stru2kt
st4so
s2t1s
s2t1t4
stu2s
s3tu
stu4s5a2
3s4t4uud
s1tä4
s4tär
s4tü2h
s1tü
1su
sua2
su4bar
su1b
su2d4r4
su4du
su5e
su4jul
su1j
4su4k1s
su1k
s5uks.
5sul1g
sul4ga
sun4de4
su4n1d
su4nis
su1ni
su1pe4
su1p
supe5s
su4p2r4
4su2r1b
5sus.
su3s4aa
su2sa2
su4ses
su1se
s5uss.
su2s1s
sus4ti
su2s1t
su4sun
su1su
su2t4r
su1t
su1t4ü
4suu1g
suu4ra
suu3sa3
2s1v
svu2s4t
1sõ
5sõ1da
sõ1d
sõ4de
4s3õh
3sõi1d
4sõie2
2s1õi1g
2s5õis
3sõ2it
sõ2l
2s3õ1li
3sõ2l1m
3sõn
2s1õ2p
5sõr
sõ1s4a4
s4õs
2s3õu
1sö
4sö1d
sö2k
2sön
1sä
4säk
4säm
1sü
4süa
5süd
5sü1g
2sü2h
s3ü1hi
2sük
s3ü4k1s
sü4la
sül5di
sü4l2d
sü3le1m
sü2le
4sü1lo
sü4ra
3süs
3sü4ü
4sž
1ta
3ta.
3taat.
t4aa1t
2tabi
ta1b
4t3ae2d
t3a2i1ne
tai1n
4tais
4ta4ko
ta1k
t2al
4ta4la1j
ta1la
ta4le1v
ta1le
tal4las
ta2l1l
tal1la
ta3lu
ta4lus
3ta1m
5ta1ma
4tan1da
ta4n1d
ta4ot
ta4p1la
ta1p
ta2p2l4
ta4p2r4
4ta4re1t
ta1re
4ta2r1m
2ta2rt
ta4se4r
ta1se
ta4ses
ta4se1t
ta4sis
ta1si
ta4sü
2tau1t
3ta1v
ta4va1j
tav4a
2t1b4
2td2
1t2e
te4aa2
tea4g
tea4h
te3an
te5a2s
3tee
tee5lu
te4e1t
te3hi
tehi4s
te3k2l4
te2k4r
te2k4v
tel4k2e
te2l1k
te4lok
te1lo
t1e3lu.
te2lu
4tepi1v
te1p
te1pi
te3p4l4
2te4p1p
3te1r
5ter.
te5r4a
te4r1d4
4te2r1g
te2rs4
te1s4a
te4si1n
te1si
te2s4k
2t1f
4t1g4
2t1h
thõl4
t1hõ
3ti
t4ia2
ti3e2
tii2k
tii4ma
tii1m
tii4sa
tii4ve
tii1v
ti1k4o
ti1k
ti3k4r
tik4vi
ti2k1v
4ti2l1m
5ti1ma
ti1m
4ti2n1f
ti1n
tin4ga
ti2n1g
ti4sai
ti1sa
tisa4v
ti4si1k
ti1si
ti3tee4
t2it
ti1t2e
2t1j
2t1k2
t3k1l4
t3k2r
2t1l4
t1lu4
2t1m
tmi1ka4
t1mi
tmi1k
tmi2s3
2t1n
3t2o
4to4da
t4o1d
toen4
to1g6
4toks.
to4k1s
toksi5k
tok1si
to4lek
to1le
t1o4lu.
to1lu
to4l4u1m
tonis4
to1ni
t2o4o
too4no4
too4pe
to4rau
to1ra
to2s4p
to2s1t4
2t3p4
2t1r
t4ra1d
t1ra
t2ra1f
3tra1fo
t4ra4h1h
5tra2l1l
t2ran
3tra2ns
t4ra1t2e
tra1t
5t4ra4u1m
t2re
3treen
t4rei
5trei1m
3tre1p
t3ri1g
t1ri
5t2rii1b
5trii1p
5trikoo.
tri1k
tri1ko
trik2o2o
tri4p2l4
t3ri1p
t4r4o2s1s
t1ro
3t2ru2m1m
t1ru
tr4u1m
5t4ru1p
3t2ruu
3t2rü
4trü4ü
2t1s
t3s2a
t3s4aa
tsa5is
t4saju
tsa1j
tsa4lan
tsa1la
3tse4h1h
t1se
t2seh
tse3la
5t4sel3lu
tse2l1l
5tsemen
tse1m
tse1me
4tse1na
5tsen1su
t4se2ns
tsi1g4
t1si
5t1siit1si
2t4sii2t1s
tsi2it
t4si2nk
tsi1n
5tsis1t2e
tsi2s1t
ts4laa
t2s1l
ts1la
t3s2o2o
t1so
t4sor
t2s1p4
t4su2s1s
t1su
2t1t
t4ta1d
t1ta
t3tee2
t1t2e
ttes2
t5tse1m
t2t1s
tt1se
3tu
4tui1m
tu4ra1j
tu1ra
tu2s1a2
tu4s5ee
tu1se
tu2si
tu2s3s
4t5uss.
tu2s3t2
tu5su
tu4sä4
tu2sü4
4tutop
tu1t
tu3t2o
4t4uud
tuu1le5
2t1v
1tõ
5tõ1b
2tõi
tõ4l
4tõ4n
4tõ2p
2t5õun
1tö
4töe
4tö1k
töö5k
töö3p
1tä
täh4t3a
tä4ht
tä5k2e
4täm
1tü
tü5he.
tü2h
tü1he
tü3hi
2t1ž
t2že
5tžek
3tže1m
uaa4
u3aa2s1t
ua2b
u5abi
u1ae
ua4he
uai4k
u3ai1n
ua2j4a
ua1j
u3a2kt
ua1k
ua2l
u3a2l1l
u3am4e1t
ua1m
ua1me
u1an
ua4nu
u5a2par
ua1p
ua1pa
ua2re
ua5ree
u5a2rt
ua2s
u3a2s1t
u1au
u4au4d
ua2v
u5ava4l1d
uav4a
u1b
u4da1lu
u1da
u4deh
u1de
udeo4
udo4r
u1do
u5eal
u3eel
u3e4k1s
ue2ma
ue1m
ueo4
ue4r
u1f
u1g
u4gi4d
ug2ra
u2g1r
u5graa
u4gü
uh4te1m
u4ht
uh1t2e
uh4te4r
uh4ti1n
uh3ti
uh4tis
ui1du5
ui1d
ui2ga
ui1g
ui4h
u3i3ha
u3i2l1m
5uim.
ui1m
ui1na2
ui1n
uin4as5
ui4si
3uisu1t
ui3su
uite4h
u2it
ui1t2e
ui4t2o
ui4va1la
ui1v
ui4ve4l
ui3ve
ui4vo
u1j
u5j4a
u4ju1j
u4j4u1m
3uju1mi
u1k
ukaa4s
u1ka
ukii4g
u1ki
uk1ki5
u4k1k
ukop4
u1ko
u3kraa
u2k2r
uk1ra
u5k1ro
uku4sa2
u1ku
u3kus
uk4vi
u2k1v
u1l4a
ul4deh
u4l1d
ul1de
ul1di4
ul4k2r
u2l1k
ul4len
u2l1l
ul1le
ul4lui
ul3lu
ult1ra5
u2lt
ul2t1r
u3lu
ulu1o4
4u1m
uma1f4
u1ma
u4mau
5umbroh
u2m1b
um2b1r
umb1ro
um4e1t4
u1me
u2m1f4
um4ia4
u1mi
um2it4
um5p4r4
u2mp
un4aa4
u1na
unaal5
un4da1k
u4n1d
un1da
un4dan
un4das
un4do
u4ni.
u1ni
u1o2
uo4h
u2or
u3o2r1g
u1p
u3p1la
u2p2l4
up3le
up1pe4
u4p1p
up4pis
up1pi
uraa4l
u1ra
u4ra1g
ura4ju
ura1j
u4ra1la
u4ra1p
u2r5au1k
ura4v4a
ura1v
3urb.
u2r1b
ur1de3
u4r1d
u5rea4
u1re
u4reos
ure2s4k
u4re2t1t
ure1t
urg4as4
u2r1g
5urge.
u4ri4m4e1t
u1ri
u3ri1m
uri1me
u4ri1ni
uri1n
uri2s4k
urka4v
u2r1k
ur1ka
uro4r
u1ro
u4ru3lu
u1ru
u2sa2
u5sa.
us4a1d4
u4s1ae
u4sa1lu
us5as1t2e
usa2s1t
u3sea
u1se
u5se1g4
u4s5elek
use1le
u4se2t1t
use1t
u3s4e3tu
u5se1v
us4fä
u2s1f2
u2s5g2
u4si4d
u1si
usi4g
u4si4h
us5i4n1d
usi1n
usi4va
usi1v
us3k2r
u2s1k
u2so
us5o2h
us3o1le
u2so2l
uso4r
u2s3p4
u3s4por
us1p4o
usui4
u1su
3usu1li
u4su2s1s
u2sõ
u2sü
u2s3ü2h
u1t
ut4k1l4
u2t1k2
utos2
u3t2o
utot4
ut4ru
u2t1r
ut4so
u2t1s
ut2t4r
u2t1t
utu4s
u3tu
utü4h
u1tü
uu5a2l
4uud
uu4du.
uu1du
uu4ka1k
uu1k
uu1ka
uuk5ri
uu2k2r
uu4mal
u4u1m
uu1ma
uu4mi2s
uu1mi
uu4pü
uu1p
uu4ran
uu1ra
uu4ras
uu4rau
uu4ra1v
uu3sa2
uusa3k
uus4k2e
uu2s1k
u3uss.
uu2s1s
uu4sul
uu1su
4uu1t
uu4tas
uu1ta
uu4tis
uu3ti
uu4tü4h
uu1tü
u5uu1ri
u1v
u4vau
u1õ2
uä2
u3är
u1ü2
u4ž4l
vaa4re4
va4as
4vabi
va1b
vae4r
va1g4
va5he
4va4i2a
4v3ai1n
va2k4v
va1k
va4la.
va1la
va4lai
4val1di
va4l1d
val4ga4
val1g
va4lü
vana5i
va1na
v2a1ne2
4v3an1ku
va2nk
van4ta
va2nt
van4t2e
vap4r4
va1p
v4ar
4va2r1m
va2r4p
2va2rt
4varuh
va1ru
4var3ve
va2r1v
va4sas
va1sa
va2s4k
vas2t4r
va2s1t
va2t4r
va1t
4vatud
v4a3tu
v4au4d
va1v4
4vb
2v1d
3ve
vee3a
vee3k
vee5la
vee3s1p
4ve2hi
vei4sa
ve4ol
veot4
ve4rah
ve1r
ve1ra
ve2s4p
2vf
2vg4
2v1h
3vi
v4ia2
vi1d4
4videa2
vi1de
vi1p4
vi3p2l4
vi2r4k
vi4sa1k
vi1sa
vis4k4o4d
vi2s1k
vis1ko
2v1j
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
2v1n
voo5lu
v2o2o
2v5p
2v1r
2v1s
2v1t2
v3t1r
vu4sa2
vu4su4
2v1v
3võ
4või1g
4võ4li
4võm
võ2r4k5
3vä
vää4re4
vää4ru
3zo
zook4
z2o2o
zoos4
õ1b
õbe3
õ1d
õea4
õe4l4an
õe1la
õe3lu
õe1t2
õeu4
õ1g
õh4vu
õ2h1v
õ4i4a
õi4b
õie5k
õie2
3õiel
3õi3gu
õi1g
õi4ko
õi1k
õi1se4
õi4su4
õ1j
õk4kõ
õ4k1k
õ4l2d
õ4li1m
õ1li
õ4l2it
õl4ma1d
õ2l1m
õl1ma
3õm2b1l
õ2m1b
õne2t4s
õ1ne
õne1t
õ2p
õ3pa
õpi5e2
õ1pi
õp2pa
õ4p1p
4õp3r4
õran1da5
õ1ra
õra4n1d
õra4s
õr4da
õ4r1d
õr4gaa
õ2r1g
õr4gar
õr4go
4õs
õ1s4a
õ4tü4
õu1de3
õ1v4
õõ5p
õõ1re4
õõ4rel
õõ4ta
öa2
ö1b
ö1d
5ö2dee
ö1de
ödi4k
ö1di
3öe4l1d
öe1p4
öe2t4r
öe1t
ö1g4
ö1h
ö4i4a
öi4g
öi4s
ö1j
ö1k
ö2kon
ö1ko
3öko1no
ö2k4v
ö1l
öli2s
ö1li
öli1s5a
ö1m
öo2
ö2p3au
ö1pa
öp4lu
ö2p2l4
ö4raa
ö1ra
ö4rau
ör4da
ö4r1d
ör4de2l1l
ör1de
ö1r4e
ö4ri4l
ö1ri
ö4ro4
ö4rä
ö4rül
ö1rü
ös4tii
ö2s1t
ös3ti
ö4t2o4
ö4tü4
ö1v
ö3õ
öö3a2
öö3e4
öö5i
3öölan
öö1l
öö1la
öö3o2
öö2t4r
öü4
äa4
ä1b
äbus5
äbu1t4
ä1d
äe3a4
äe1o
ä1g
äg2a4ri
ähe5a
ä1he
äidi4s
äi1d
äi1di
äi1k2e3
äi1k
äi4lo
äi4lu
äi2s
äi1sa4
äi4sõ
äi4tar
ä2it
äi1ta
ä3j
ä2k2e
3äke.
ä5ke1r
ä4kõ
äli2s
ä1li
äl4ko
ä2l1k
5äm2b1l
ä2m1b
ä4nah
ä1na
än4deo
ä4n1d
än1de
äne1t4
ä1ne
än4t2o4
ä2nt
äok4
ä4ra5a
ä1ra
ära3o4
ä4rar
äre4lis
ä1re
äre3li
äre1t4
ärge4l
ä2r1g
ärii4
ä1ri
äri4k1l4
äri1k
äri4sel
äri1se
ä4ris1t2e
äri2s1t
är4kar
ä2r1k
är1ka
ä4ro
5ärr2it
ä2r1r
är3ri
är4ta
ä2rt
är2va
ä2r1v
ä4rõ
äs4ko
ä2s1k
äs4nai
ä2s1n
äs1na
ä2s4p
äs4san
ä2s1s
äs1sa
äs4so
ät4ri
ä2t1r
äu4d
ä1v
ävee4
ä3ve
ää4ki1n
ää1ki
ääo4
ää4ra1se
ää1ra
5ääris.
ää1ri
üaa4
ü1b
üda1me5
ü1da
ü5da1m
ü1g
ü2h
ühe5i4
ü1he
1ühen
3ühik.
ü1hi
ühi1k
ü3h2it
ü1j
ükan4
ü1ka
ük4kas
ü4k1k
ük1ka
ü2k3l4
ü4l2d
ül1d5a2
ü2le
3ülek
ü5lel
üle4mas
üle1m
üle1ma
1üle2s
üle1sä4
ül4ga1v
ül1g
ül4gee
ü4lih
ü1li
ülii4
3üli1ko
üli1k
ü4li1õ2
ül5k1l4
ü2l1k
ül5la
ü2l1l
ül4mei
ü2l1m
ül1me
ülo4r
ü1lo
ü2l1p4
ü2lt4
üma4ra1k
ü1ma
üm4a1ra
üma4ru
ümi4ko
ü1mi
ümi1k
ü5ne
üni4s
ü1ni
üot4
ü2p3l4
ü4p5p4
üp3r4
üp1su4
ü2p1s
ü4r1d4
üri1k4
ü1ri
ü1s4o
üs4p2r4
ü2s1p
üs4t2al
ü2s1t
üs1ta
üs4tas
üta4r
ü1ta
ütee4l
ü1t2e
ü3tee
5ütle1v
ü2t1l4
üt1le
ü4t3r
üt4ru
ü1v
ü4ü
üü2l3a2
üü4le
üü4lo
üü4pe
1ža
4žb
1že
5žee
5že1r
4žf
1ži
4žj
4žk
4žl
4žm
4žn
3žo
4žp
4žt
5žö
5žü
2žž
3ša
4ša1k
4šau
1še
3š4i
ši2s4k
4šk
5šo
4št
3šu4
